Maine, session 132, LD504.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 19-A MRSA §1653, sub-§3, ¶O, as amended by PL 2021, c. 647, Pt. B,
§46 and affected by §65, is further amended to read:
O. A parent's prior willful misuse of the emergency parental rights and responsibilities
order process in section 1653-B or the protection from abuse process in former chapter
101 or chapter 103 in order to gain tactical advantage in a proceeding involving the
determination of parental rights and responsibilities of a minor child. Such willful
misuse may be considered only if established by clear and convincing evidence and if
it is further found by clear and convincing evidence that, in the particular circumstances
of the parents and child, that willful misuse tends to show that the acting parent will in
the future have a lessened ability and willingness to cooperate and work with the other
parent in their shared responsibilities for the child. The court shall articulate findings
of fact whenever relying upon this factor as part of its determination of a child's best
interest. The voluntary dismissal of a motion for an emergency parental rights and
responsibilities order or a protection from abuse petition may not, taken alone, be
treated as evidence of the willful misuse of the emergency parental rights and
responsibilities order process or the protection from abuse process;
Sec. 2. 19-A MRSA §1653-B is enacted to read:
§1653-B. Emergency parental rights and responsibilities order
1. Motion. A party to an action under this Title concerning parental rights, including
actions for divorce, legal separation, parentage or parental rights and responsibilities and
post-judgment proceedings arising out of these actions, may file a motion requesting that
the court issue an emergency parental rights and responsibilities order with respect to a
child on an ex parte basis upon a showing of immediate and present risk of substantial harm
to the physical or emotional health or safety of the child. A motion may not be filed under
this section as part of a protection from abuse proceeding under chapter 103.
2. Affidavit required. A motion for an emergency parental rights and responsibilities
order must be accompanied by an affidavit made under oath alleging:
A. The conditions establishing an immediate and present risk of substantial harm to
the physical or emotional health or safety of the child; and
B. The actions taken by the party filing the request to inform the other party or parties
to the proceeding of the motion or the reasons why the court should consider the request
without requiring notice to the other party.
3. Temporary relief. The court may, in an ex parte proceeding, enter an emergency
parental rights and responsibilities order containing any relief that the court considers
necessary to address the immediate and present risk of substantial harm to the physical or
emotional health or safety of the child. An order issued under this subsection may include:
A. An allocation of parental rights and responsibilities between the parties;
B. Conditions governing parent-child contact, including but not limited to prohibiting
parent-child contact;
C. Directives regarding the residence of the child, including but not limited to
authorizing or prohibiting relocation of the child; and
Page 1 - 132LR0735(01)

D. Any other relief determined appropriate in the discretion of the court.
4. Denial of motion. Before denying a motion for an emergency parental rights and
responsibilities order, the court shall:
A. Allow the moving party to be heard, accompanied by a person of the party's choice;
and
B. Advise the moving party of the reasons for the denial.
5. Service. A party who files a motion for an emergency parental rights and
responsibilities order under this section shall:
A. If the court issues an order under subsection 3, arrange for the motion, affidavit and
order to be personally served on the other party in a manner allowed by the applicable
rule of civil procedure along with the original complaint or post-judgment motion that
accompanied the motion, if any; or
B. If the court denies the motion under subsection 4, arrange for the motion, affidavit
and order denying the motion to be served on the other party in a manner allowed by
the applicable rule of civil procedure along with the original complaint or post-
judgment motion that accompanied the motion, if any.
6. Hearing. If the court enters an order under subsection 3, the court shall hold a
hearing within 21 days of the issuance of the order. The scope of the hearing is limited to
the necessity of continuing the temporary relief granted in the emergency parental rights
and responsibilities order. This section does not limit the court's discretion to continue the
hearing upon the court's own motion or upon the motion of either party. If the court denies
the motion under subsection 4, the parties are not entitled to a hearing under this subsection
and the court may enter a scheduling order or any other order that the interests of justice
require.
7. Dissolution or modification. A party whose parental rights are affected by an
emergency parental rights and responsibilities order issued under subsection 3, other than
the party who requested the order, may appear and move for the dissolution or modification
of the order before the scheduled hearing. The motion must be accompanied by a sworn
affidavit. The court shall schedule a hearing on the motion as expeditiously as the interests
of justice require.
8. Jurisdiction; procedure. A motion for an emergency parental rights and
responsibilities order under this section may be reviewed and an order may be issued by a
District Court Judge or a family law magistrate. The clerk shall present the motion to a
District Court Judge or family law magistrate upon docketing. If no judge or family law
magistrate is available at the courthouse in which the request is made, the clerk shall
forward the motion to any available judicial officer within the State.
Sec. 3. Working group. The Maine Commission on Domestic and Sexual Abuse,
established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 12004-I, subsection 74-C, shall
convene a working group of stakeholders including commission members, representatives
of the judicial branch, family law practitioners, members of the Family Law Advisory
Commission established in Title 5, section 12004-I, subsection 52-A, representatives of a
statewide coalition to end domestic violence and any others that the commission determines
to be necessary participants. To the extent possible, the members of the working group
Page 2 - 132LR0735(01)

414 must be the same as the members of the working group established pursuant to Resolve
425 2021, chapter 99.
1. Duties. The working group shall review data provided by the judicial branch for at
least 2 years following implementation of this Act, including data on the number of requests
for emergency parental rights and responsibilities orders filed, the number of emergency
parental rights and responsibilities orders issued, the average time between the filing of a
request and the hearing on that request, if any, and any other data determined by the judicial
branch to be useful for evaluating efficacy of the new process.
2. Report; legislation. The commission shall submit a report to the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over judiciary matters no later than
November 1, 2028. The report must identify the working group's participants, summarize
the activities of the working group and include any conclusions made by the working group
regarding the effectiveness of the emergency parental rights and responsibilities order
process established in Title 19-A, section 1653-B. The report may include the working
group's recommendations for further improving the family court response to families with
urgent safety concerns. The joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over judiciary matters may report out legislation to the 134th Legislature in 2029 based on
the report.
Sec. 4. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.